Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-533.01
Involvement of parents, guardians, and educational decisionmakers; policy; accessibility.

By August 1, 2025, each school district shall make the policy required by section 79-531 accessible on the school district's public website. The policy shall be accessible by a prominently displayed link on such website. If the policy is altered, the new version of the policy shall be made accessible within a reasonable time thereafter.

Laws 2024, LB71, § 5.
July 19, 2024